Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and emergency medical personnel. Whoever new text begin physically new text end assaults deleted text begin any of the following personsdeleted text end and inflicts demonstrable bodily harm new text begin onto a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department or emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties new text end is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothdeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (1) a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department or emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency department. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin Nurses and physicians. new text end new text begin Whoever physically assaults and inflicts demonstrable bodily harm on a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end